Illinois, session 104th, HB5388.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Solar 5Energy Reliability and Affordability Checkoff Program Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) the clean energy sector is a vitally important 8    element of the State's economy that sits at a critical 9    inflection point, with widespread market adoption underway 10    but underfunded public communications makes the sector 11    vulnerable to misinformation;12        (2) nationwide, fossil fuel trade associations 13    outspend clean energy advocacy 28 to 1, distorting public 14    understanding and undermining public trust and legislative 15    support;16        (3) to correct for this market inequity, Illinois must 17    launch a State-based checkoff program to support public 18    education and workforce development and boost consumer 19    confidence in low-cost, energy independent, resilient, 20    clean energy technologies;21        (4) the clean energy checkoff program will be designed 22    to enhance and preserve the economic interests of 23    Illinois;  HB5388- 2 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1        (5) a technology-specific, fee-based mechanism is 2    necessary to ensure all industry participants contribute 3    equitably and to avoid free rider problems; and4        (6) Illinois has a unique opportunity to model a 5    rapid, tailored, and transparent approach to promoting 6    clean energy, supporting its climate goals and supporting 7    its energy affordability and environmental justice 8    commitments. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Board" means the Solar Energy Reliability and 11Affordability Board.12    "Clean energy" has the meaning given to that term in 13Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act.14    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.15    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture.16    "Fund" means the Solar Energy Reliability and 17Affordability Fund. 18    Section 15. Solar Energy Reliability and Affordability 19Fund. The Solar Energy Reliability and Affordability Fund is 20created as a special fund in the State treasury to be 21administered by the Solar Energy Reliability and Affordability 22Board. The Fund may receive deposits of moneys collected by 23the Department of Agriculture under Section 30 of this Act.   HB5388- 3 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1    Section 20. Solar Energy Reliability and Affordability 2Board.3    (a) The Solar Energy Reliability and Affordability Board 4is created to administer and manage the Fund.5    (b) The members of the Board shall be appointed by the 6Governor as follows:7        (1) Two representatives of owners, operators, or 8    developers of community solar systems;9        (2) Two representatives of owners, operators, or 10    developers of utility-scale solar systems;11        (3) Two representatives of owners, operators, or 12    developers of residential solar systems; and13        (4) One representative of a solar energy trade 14    association.15    (c) The total administrative costs to manage the Board 16shall not exceed 5% of the annual assessments made under 17Section 30. Board members may be compensated for work 18performed on behalf of the Board, and may be refunded for 19travel and administrative expenses incurred in performing 20their duties as members of the Board.21    (d) Terms of appointment for Board members may not exceed 225 years. A Board member may serve no more than 2 terms.23    (e) The Governor shall appoint Board members on or before 24December 31, 2026.25    (f) The Board shall ensure that assessments collected 26under Section 30 of this Act are used for the creation and   HB5388- 4 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1publication of research, communication, marketing, and 2education programs that promote accurate information related 3to, emphasize the clean energy benefits and affordability of, 4and promote the adoption of solar energy systems and energy 5storage systems, which may include the funding of third-party 6organizations for these purposes and any related activities to 7carry out the programs as proposed by the Board. Assessments 8authorized for the programs listed in this subsection (f) 9shall not be used for political activity of any kind or for 10preferential treatment of any person to the detriment of other 11persons in the applicable program.12    (g) The Board may cooperate with any other local, State, 13or national commission, organization, or agency, whether 14voluntary or created by State or national law, that is engaged 15in work or activities similar to the work and activities of the 16Board in the promotion of State solar energy systems and may 17recommend that the Department enter into contracts and 18agreements with these organizations or agencies for joint 19research, communication, marketing, and education programs. 20    Section 25. Solar energy fees.21    (a) Each owner, operator, or developer of a solar energy 22system shall pay a 2 cents per watt assessment on all solar 23energy systems sold for installation within this State to the 24Department of Agriculture.25    (b) The assessment shall apply to both (1) wholesale and   HB5388- 5 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1retail transactions in this State, including online sales 2shipped to addresses in this State, and (2) purchases made for 3solar energy systems by individuals, businesses, government 4agencies, and public utilities within this State.5    (c) The Board may increase the amount of the assessment 6every 2 years based on inflation and program needs, but not to 7an amount that exceeds 0.5% of the wholesale value of the 8product. 9    Section 30. Collection of solar energy fees.10    (a) Assessments under Section 25 are payable directly to 11the Board and shall be paid when a commercial renewable energy 12facility owner enters into an agricultural impact mitigation 13agreement as required under the Renewable Energy Facilities 14Agricultural Impact Mitigation Act.15    (b) Assessments under Section 25 for owners, operators, or 16developers of a solar energy system that are not required to 17enter into an agricultural impact mitigation agreement during 18the development of a project are payable directly to the Board 19and shall be paid when a developer enters into a contract for 20the delivery of renewable energy credits facilitated by the 21Illinois Power Agency.22    (c) If an owner, operator, or developer fails to remit the 23full amount of an assessment under Section 25 or such other sum 24within 30 days after the due date, the owner, operator, or 25developer shall be given an opportunity to present their case   HB5388- 6 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1before the Board. Once the correct assessment is determined, 2the Board may add to such unpaid assessment or other sum a 3penalty amount not exceeding 10% of the amount due plus the 4costs of enforcing the collection of the assessment or sum. If 5an owner, operator, or developer fails to remit any properly 6due assessment or sum, the Board may bring a civil action 7against the person in the circuit court of any county in this 8State for the collection of, together with the additional 9specified 10% penalty assessment, the costs of enforcing the 10collection of the assessment and any court costs. The action 11shall be tried and judgment shall be rendered as in any other 12cause of action for debts due and payable. All assessments are 13due and payable to the Board. 14    Section 35. Reporting and auditing.15    (a) The Board shall publish an annual financial and 16activities report that includes the amount of funds collected 17and any expenditures for programs.18    (b) The Board shall be audited at least annually by a 19certified public accountant. The audit shall be made available 20within 30 days after its completion to the Director and each 21Board member for dissemination to their respective 22organizations.23    (c) The cost of an audit under this Section shall be 24covered by moneys deposited into the Fund.   HB5388- 7 -LRB104 19707 AAS 33156 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 3    Section 100. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 4Section 5.1038 as follows: 5    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)6    Sec. 5.1038. The Solar Energy Reliability and 7Affordability Fund. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.